Washington statutes.
RCW 36.64.110

Conferences to study regional and governmental problems—Public purpose—Contributions to support by municipal corporations.

The formation of the conference is hereby declared to be a public purpose, and any municipal corporation may contribute to the expenses of such conference pursuant to the budgetary laws of the municipal corporations and such bylaws as may be adopted by the conference: PROVIDED, That services and facilities may be provided by a municipal corporation in lieu of assessment.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 84 s 4.]